District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-1314

Disturbing religious congregation.

Repealed.

History

July 29, 1892, 27 Stat. 324, ch. 320, § 11
May 26, 2011, D.C. Law 18-375,§ 2(c), 58 DCR 731

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1114.
1973 Ed., § 22-1114.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 302(c) of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-693, January 18, 2011, 58 DCR 640).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 302(c) of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-45, April 20, 2011, 58 DCR 3701).